Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
Multiple Party Accounts

391.300.
Definitions.

As used in KRS

391.305

to

391.360

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Account” means a contract of deposit of funds between a depositor and a financial institution, and includes a checking account, savings account, certificate of deposit, share account and other like arrangement;

“Beneficiary” means a person named in a trust account as one for whom a party to the account is named as trustee;

“Financial institution” means any organization authorized to do business under state or federal laws relating to financial institutions, including, without limitation, banks and trust companies, savings banks, building and loan associations, savings and loan companies or associations, and credit unions;

“Joint account” means an account payable on request to one (1) or more of two (2) or more parties whether or not mention is made of any right of survivorship;

A “multiple-party account” is any of the following types of account: (i) a joint account, (ii) a P.O.D. account, or (iii) a trust account. It does not include accounts established for deposit of funds of a partnership, joint venture, or other association for business purposes, or accounts controlled by one (1) or more persons as the duly authorized agent or trustee for a corporation, unincorporated association, charitable or civic organization or a regular fiduciary or trust account where the relationship is established other than by deposit agreement;

“Net contribution” of a party to a joint account as of any given time is the sum of all deposits thereto made by or for him, less all withdrawals made by or for him which have not been paid to or applied to the use of any other party, plus a pro rata share of any interest or dividends included in the current balance. The term includes, in addition, any proceeds of deposit life insurance added to the account by reason of the death of the party whose net contribution is in question;

“Party” means a person who, by the terms of the account, has subject to request, a present right, exercisable alone or jointly with one (1) or more other parties, to payment from a multiple-party account. A P.O.D. payee or beneficiary of a trust account is a party only after the account becomes payable to him by reason of his surviving the original payee or trustee. Unless the context otherwise requires, it includes a guardian, conservator, personal representative, or assignee, including an attaching creditor, of a party. It also includes a person identified as a trustee of an account for another whether or not a beneficiary is named, but it does not include any named beneficiary unless he has a present right of withdrawal;

“Payment” of sums on deposit includes withdrawal, payment on check or other directive of a party, and any pledge of sums on deposit by a party and any set-off, or reduction or other disposition of all or part of an account pursuant to a pledge;

“Proof of death” includes a death certificate or record or report which is prima facie proof of death;

“P.O.D. account” means an account payable on request to one (1) person during lifetime and on his death to one (1) or more P.O.D. payees, or to one (1) or more persons during their lifetimes and on the death of all of them to one (1) or more P.O.D. payees;

“P.O.D. payee” means a person designated on a P.O.D. account as one to whom the account is payable on request after the death of one (1) or more persons;

“Request” means a proper request for withdrawal, or a check or order for payment, which complies with all conditions of the account, including special requirements concerning the necessary signature or number of signatures of the parties to the account which may be required for a proper request and regulations of the financial institution; but if the financial institution conditions withdrawal or payment on advance notice, for purposes of KRS

391.305

to

391.360

, the request for withdrawal or payment is treated as immediately effective and a notice of intent to withdraw is treated as a request for withdrawal;

“Sums on deposit” means the balance payable on a multiple-party account including interest, dividends, and in addition any deposit life insurance proceeds added to the account by reason of the death of a party;

“Trust account” means an account in the name of one (1) or more parties as trustee for one (1) or more beneficiaries where the relationship is established by the form of the account and the deposit agreement with the financial institution and there is no subject of the trust other than the sums on deposit in the account; it is not essential that payment to the beneficiary be mentioned in the deposit agreement. A trust account does not include a regular trust account under a testamentary trust or a trust agreement which has significance apart from the account, or a fiduciary account arising from a fiduciary relation such as attorney-client;

“Withdrawal” includes payment to a third person pursuant to check or other directive of a party;

A financial institution “receives” an order or notice under KRS

391.305

to

391.360

when it is duly delivered at the place of business at which the multiple-party account was originally established or at any other place held out by the financial institution as the place for receipt of such communication.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 26.

391.305.
Ownership as between parties and others — Protection of financial institutions.

The provisions of KRS

391.310

to

391.320

concerning beneficial ownership as between parties, or as between parties and P.O.D. payees or beneficiaries of multiple-party accounts, are relevant only to controversies between these persons and their creditors and other successors, and have no bearing on the power of withdrawal of these persons as determined by the terms of account contracts. The provisions of KRS

391.335

to

391.360

govern the liability of financial institutions who make payments pursuant thereto, and their set-off rights.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 27.

391.310.
Ownership during lifetime.

A joint account belongs, during the lifetime of all parties, to the parties in proportion to the net contributions by each to the sums on deposit, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a different intent.

A P.O.D. account belongs to the original payee during his lifetime and not to the P.O.D. payee or payees; if two (2) or more parties are named as original payees, during their lifetimes rights as between them are governed by subsection (1) of this section.

Unless a contrary intent is manifested by the terms of the account or the deposit agreement or there is other clear and convincing evidence of an irrevocable trust, a trust account belongs beneficially to the trustee during his lifetime, and if two (2) or more parties are named as trustee on the account, during their lifetimes beneficial rights as between them are governed by subsection (1) of this section. If there is an irrevocable trust, the account belongs beneficially to the beneficiary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 28.

391.315.
Right of survivorship.

Sums remaining on deposit at the death of a party to a joint account belong to the surviving party or parties to the account as against the estate of the decedent unless there is clear and convincing written evidence of a different intention at the time the account is created. If there are two or more surviving parties their respective ownerships during lifetime shall be in proportion to their previous ownership interests under KRS

391.310

augmented by an equal share for each survivor of any interest the decedent may have owned in the account immediately before his death; and the right of survivorship continues between the surviving parties.

In transferring or releasing joint account funds subsequent to the date of death of one (1) or more of the named joint account holders, a financial institution or other appropriate third party may rely conclusively on the form and terms of the account to pay in accordance with paragraph (a) of this subsection. The transfer or release of those joint account funds has no bearing on the actual rights of ownership of the funds as between the surviving party or parties to the account and the dower or curtesy interest of any surviving spouse. The transfer or release by a financial institution or third party in accordance with this section shall constitute a full release and discharge of the financial institution or third party from all claims relating to ownership.

If the account is a P.O.D. account, on death of the original payee or of the survivor of two or more original payees, any sums remaining on deposit belong to the P.O.D. payee or payees if surviving, or to the survivor of them if one or more die before the original payee; if two or more P.O.D. payees survive, there is no right of survivorship in event of death of a P.O.D. payee thereafter unless the terms of the account or deposit agreement expressly provide for survivorship between them.

If the account is a trust account, on death of the trustee or the survivor of two or more trustees, any sums remaining on deposit belong to the person or persons named as beneficiaries, if surviving, or to the survivor of them if one or more die before the trustee, unless there is clear and convincing evidence of a contrary intent; if two or more beneficiaries survive, there is no right of survivorship in event of death of any beneficiary thereafter unless the terms of the account or deposit agreement expressly provide for survivorship between them.

In other cases, the death of any party to a multiple-party account has no effect on beneficial ownership of the account other than to transfer the rights of the decedent as part of his estate.

A right of survivorship arising from the express terms of the account or under this section, a beneficiary designation in a trust account, or a P.O.D. payee designation, cannot be changed by will.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 29; 1998, ch. 196, § 24, effective July 15, 1998.

391.320.
Effect of written notice to financial institution.

The provisions of KRS

391.315

as to rights of survivorship are determined by the form of the account at the death of a party. This form may be altered by written order from any party able to request present payment without the joinder of any other party given to the financial institution to change the form of the account or to stop or vary payment under the terms of the account. The order must be signed by said party, received by the financial institution during the party’s lifetime, and not countermanded by other written order of the same party during his lifetime.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 30.

391.325.
Accounts and transfers nontestamentary.

Any transfers resulting from the application of KRS

391.315

are effective by reason of the account contracts involved and this statute and are not to be considered as testamentary.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 31.

391.330.
Payment on signature of one party.

Financial institutions may enter into multiple-party accounts to the same extent that they may enter into single-party accounts. Any multiple-party account may be paid, on request to any one (1) or more of the parties. A financial institution shall not be required to inquire as to the source of funds received for deposit to a multiple-party account, or to inquire as to the proposed application of any sum withdrawn from an account, for purposes of establishing net contributions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 32.

391.335.
Payment after death or disability.

Any sums in a joint account may be paid, on request, to any party without regard to whether any other party is incapacitated or deceased at the time the payment is demanded; but payment may not be made to the personal representative or heirs of a deceased party unless proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that the decedent was the last surviving party or unless there is no right of survivorship under KRS

391.315

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 33.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Payments of a jointly owned bank account to the joint survivor, disbursement of remaining funds in a P.O.D. account to the surviving payee, or disbursement of remaining funds in a trust account to beneficiaries can only be made upon a written waiver from the Department of Revenue.

OAG 76-501

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Whiteside and Harman, Kentucky Taxation, 67 Ky. L.J. 739 (1978-79).

391.340.
Payment of P.O.D. account.

Any P.O.D. account may be paid, on request, to any original party to the account. Payment may be made, on request, to the P.O.D. payee or to the personal representative or heirs of a deceased P.O.D. payee upon presentation to the financial institution of proof of death showing that the P.O.D. payee survived all persons named as original payees. Payment may be made to the personal representative or heirs of a deceased original payee if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that the deceased original payee was the survivor of all other persons named on the account either as an original payee or as P.O.D. payee.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 34.

391.345.
Payment of trust account.

Any trust account may be paid, on request, to any trustee. Unless the financial institution has received written notice that the beneficiary has a vested interest not dependent upon his surviving the trustee, payment may be made to the personal representative or heirs of a deceased trustee if proof of death is presented to the financial institution showing that the deceased trustee was the survivor of all other persons named on the account either as trustee or beneficiary. Payment may be made, on request, to the beneficiary upon presentation to the financial institution of proof of death showing that the beneficiary or beneficiaries survived all persons named as trustees.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 35.

391.350.
Discharge.

Payment made pursuant to KRS

391.330

to

391.345

discharges the financial institution from all claims for amounts so paid whether or not the payment is consistent with the beneficial ownership of the account as between parties, P.O.D. payees, or beneficiaries, or their successors. The protection here given does not extend to payments made after a financial institution has received written notice from any party to the effect that withdrawals in accordance with the terms of the account should not be permitted. Unless the notice is withdrawn by the person giving it, any other party to the account and the successor of any deceased party must concur in any demand for withdrawal if the financial institution is to be protected under this section. No other notice or any other information shown to have been available to a financial institution shall affect its right to the protection provided here. The protection here provided shall have no bearing on the rights of parties in disputes between themselves or their successors concerning the beneficial ownership of funds in, or withdrawn from, multiple-party accounts.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 36.

391.355.
Set-off.

Without qualifying any common law or any other statutory right to set-off or lien and subject to any contractual provision, if a party to a multiple-party account is indebted to a financial institution, the financial institution has a right to set-off against the account in which the party has or had immediately before his death a present right of withdrawal without the joinder of any other party. The amount of the account subject to set-off is that proportion to which the debtor is, or was immediately before his death, beneficially entitled, and in the absence of actual knowledge of net contributions by the financial institution, to an equal share with all parties having present rights of withdrawal without the joinder of any other party.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 37.